Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
D

EEP DRILLING FOR OIL, GAS, AND OTHER MINERALS

Cross references.

- Obtaining rights of way for mining, quarrying, and other purposes,

§

44-9-70

et seq.

12-4-40. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Oil and Gas and Deep Drilling Act of 1975."

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-41. Legislative findings and declaration of policy.

The General Assembly finds and declares that its duty to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state requires that adequate protection of underground fresh water supplies be assured in any drilling operation which may penetrate through any stratum which contains fresh water. This duty further requires that adequate protection be assured in any drilling or the use of such drilled wells in certain other environmentally sensitive areas or in other circumstances where the result of such drilling and use may endanger the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state. It is not the policy of the General Assembly to regulate the drilling of shallow exploration or engineering holes except in such environmentally sensitive areas as defined in this part. The General Assembly further finds and declares that oil and gas exploration to identify new sources of energy should not occur at the expense of our important natural resources such as residential, municipal, and industrial supplies of fresh water. The General Assembly further finds and declares that it should continue to encourage oil and gas exploration. The General Assembly further finds and declares that with an increase in oil exploration, it must provide assurances to persons engaging in such exploration that adequate safeguards regarding results of exploration will remain privileged information for a specified time. The General Assembly further finds and declares that it is in the public interest to obtain, protect, and disseminate all possible geologic information associated with drilling operations in order to further the purposes of future energy related research.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a hyphen was deleted from "energy related" in the last sentence of this Code section.

12-4-42. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

(1.1) "Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Drilling" means the boring of a hole in the earth by remote mechanical means and all associated activities, including but not limited to casing, perforating, plugging, cementing, and capping.

"Environmentally sensitive area of the coastal zone" means that area of the coastal zone where salt-water-bearing strata overlie the fresh-water aquifer system.

"Field" means the general area which is underlaid or appears to be underlaid by at least one pool. This term shall include the underground reservoir or reservoirs containing crude petroleum oil or natural gas, or both. The words "field" and "pool" mean the same thing when only one underground reservoir is involved; however, "field," unlike "pool," may relate to two or more pools.

"Gas" means all natural gas, including casing-head gas, and all other hydrocarbons not defined as oil in paragraph (10) of this Code section.

(5.1) "Hydraulic fracturing" means those operations conducted in an individual well bore designed to increase the flow of hydrocarbons from the rock formation to such well bore through modification of the permeability of reservoir rock by fracturing it through application of fluids under pressure.

"Illegal mineral" means any mineral, including oil or gas, which has been produced within the State of Georgia in violation of this part, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to this part, or any order issued under this part.

"Illegal product" means any product of oil, gas, or other mineral, any part of which was processed or derived, in whole or in part, from an illegal mineral.

"Mineral" means any naturally occurring substance found in the earth which has commercial value. This term shall include oil and gas, as defined in this Code section, but shall not include fresh water.

"Mineral product" means any commodity made from any mineral.

"Oil" means crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, which are produced at the well in liquid form by ordinary production methods and which are not the result of condensation of gas after it leaves the reservoir.

"Owner" means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from any pool and to appropriate the production either for himself or herself and another, or himself or herself and others.

"Person" means any natural person, corporation, joint venture, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary or representative of any kind, all agencies or instrumentalities of the state, and all county or municipal governments or any authority.

"Pool" means an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of crude petroleum oil or natural gas, or both. Each zone of a general structure which is completely separated from any other zone in the structure is covered by the term "pool" as used in this part.

"Producer" means the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas, or both.

"Tender" means a permit or certificate of clearance for the transportation of minerals, including oil and gas, or mineral products produced under this part, approved and issued or registered under the authority of the board.

"Unitization agreement" means a voluntary agreement between operators to create operation units.

"Waste," in addition to its ordinary meaning, means "physical waste" as that term is generally understood in the oil and gas industry. The term shall also include, but not be limited to:

The inefficient, excessive, or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner which results, or tends to result, in a reduction in the quantity of oil or gas ultimately to be recovered from any pool in this state;

The inefficient storing of oil and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner causing, or tending to cause, unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas;

Abuse of the correlative rights and opportunities of each owner of gas or oil in a common reservoir due to nonuniform, disproportionate, and unratable withdrawals causing undue drainage between tracts of lands;

The production of oil or gas in such a manner as to cause unnecessary water channeling or zoning;

The operation of any oil well or wells with an inefficient gas-oil ratio;

The drowning with water of any stratum or part thereof capable of producing gas or oil, except where approval for such a project has been granted by the department;

Underground waste, however caused and whether or not defined, as the same relates to any activity regulated by this part;

The creation of unnecessary fire hazards as the same relates to any activity regulated by this part;

The escape into the open air, from a well producing both oil and gas, of gas in excess of the amount which is necessary in the efficient drilling or operation of the well; and

Permitting gas produced from a gas well to escape into the air, except for testing purposes.

"Well" means any boring drilled in the search for or the production of oil, gas, or other minerals or water.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, § 8; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 3; Ga. L. 1976, p. 544, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-43. Powers of board as to deep drilling.

For the purpose of this part:

The board shall have the authority to make such inquiries as it may deem necessary into any matter over which it has jurisdiction;

The board shall have the jurisdiction of and authority over the drilling of and subsequent use of any well for the exploration or production of oil and gas; any well for the exploration or production of any other mineral drilled to a depth greater than 1,800 feet; any well for the exploration or production of any mineral located in the environmentally sensitive area of the coastal zone and which is drilled to a depth sufficient to penetrate the fresh-water aquifer system; any underground storage well with the exception of those wells covered by Article 3 of Chapter 4 of Title 46; any well for the underground disposal of waste materials; any well for the production of fresh water drilled to a depth greater than 1,800 feet; and any well for the exploration or production of brine or salt water;

The board shall have the authority to regulate the spacing of wells and the production of all oil and gas and the production of any other minerals produced through a well or bore hole in liquid or slurry form to a depth greater than 1,800 feet or located in the environmentally sensitive area; provided, however, that this authority does not extend to the drilling of wells for the production of fresh water used for drinking, residential, industrial, or agricultural purposes, except as provided for in paragraph (2) of this Code section;

The board shall have the power to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part;

The board may delegate to the director the administrative duties and powers, including, without limitation, the power to consider and issue permits to drill wells and to establish drilling and operation units, created under the authority of this part; and

Upon receipt of at least 12 applications during a calendar year for any permit to drill any well for the exploration or production of oil or gas, the board may delegate to the director the authority to create an Oil and Gas Board to review and issue permits and regulate drilling activity. Any such Oil and Gas Board shall consist of the state geologist and three other members appointed by the Governor.

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 544, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-44. Authority to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations.

The board shall have the authority to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations dealing with the control of matters over which it has jurisdiction under this part. Such rules and regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, rules and regulations for the following purposes:

To require the drilling, casing, and plugging of wells regulated under this part to be done in such a manner as to prevent the escape of oil or gas out of one stratum into another stratum; to prevent the pollution of fresh surface-water and ground-water supplies by oil, gas, salt water, or other contaminants; and to require reasonable bonds;

To require the making of reports showing the location of all wells regulated under this part, including the filing of drill cutting samples, cores, and copies of all logs, and to further require that the operator submit the name classification used for each of the subsurface formations penetrated and the depth at which each such formation was penetrated;

To prevent the drowning by water of any stratum or part thereof capable of producing oil or gas in paying quantities and to prevent the premature and irregular encroachment of water which reduces the total ultimate recovery of oil or gas from any pool;

To require the operation of wells regulated under this part with efficient gas-oil ratios and to fix such ratios;

To prevent "blowouts," "caving," and "seepage" in the sense that conditions indicated by such terms are generally understood in the oil and gas business;

To prevent fires, waste, and spillage as same relates to any activity regulated by the provisions of this part;

To identify the ownership of all oil or gas wells, producing leases, refineries, tanks, plants, structures, and all storage and transportation equipment and facilities;

To regulate the "shooting," perforating, fracturing, hydraulic fracturing, and chemical treatment of wells;

To regulate secondary recovery methods, including, but not limited to, the introduction of gas, oil, water, or other substances into producing formations;

To limit and prorate the production of oil or gas, or both, from any pool or field for the prevention of waste as defined in Code Section 12-4-42;

To require, either generally or in or from particular areas, certificates of clearance or tenders in connection with the transportation of oil or gas produced in Georgia;

To regulate the spacing of wells and to establish drilling units;

To prevent, insofar as is practical, avoidable drainage from each developed unit which is not equalized by counterdrainage;

To establish procedures for the plugging and abandonment of wells regulated under this part and to establish procedures for the restoration and reclamation of well sites;

To require that accurate records be kept on forms to be prescribed by the director, which records shall be reported to the director within the time specified in such rules and regulations; reports shall include such information as the director may prescribe, including, but not limited to, information concerning cuttings, subsurface samples, and lithologic and geophysical logs;

To require that geologic and testing information obtained from a well regulated under this part be held in confidence by the director for a period of at least six months from the time of drilling to total depth, or, if the director approves, a longer period, if the operator makes a written request for the same stating the length of the extension desired and the reasons therefor; provided, however, that the guarantee of confidentiality provided for in this paragraph shall in no way impair the ability of the board or the director to enforce this part;

To regulate the issuance, denial, and revocation of permits and to regulate bonds required under this part, except as to persons provided for in paragraph (18) of this subsection;

To regulate the issuance of permits to persons who have been found to have violated any provision of this part, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to this part, or any order or permit issued under this part, and to establish the amount of bond for such persons;

To regulate the cooperative development or operation of all or part of an oil or gas pool as a unit;

To require that certain geophysical logging and other tests be conducted to ensure that the requirements of paragraphs (1), (8), and (14) of this subsection are met; and

To regulate the underground storage or disposal of substances other than those substances covered by the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 4 of Title 46.

On or before July 1, 2019, the board shall adopt regulations governing hydraulic fracturing operations. Such regulations shall include, at a minimum:

Provisions for public notice of any application for any permit for any hydraulic fracturing well, such notice to be given before any decision on the permit application. The contents of such public notice shall include, at a minimum:

The name, address, and telephone number of the division contact where further information can be obtained;

The name and address of the applicant;

The location of the well proposed to be fractured and the route of any directional borehole to the end point of such borehole;

A brief description of the project, including information regarding the sources of water to be used as base fluid and estimated amounts and methods of waste-water disposal; and

A brief description of the public comment period and procedures the director will follow to determine whether to issue the permit;

Provisions for the identification of ground-water sources within one-half mile of any proposed wellhead and within one-half mile along the route of any directional borehole to the end point of such borehole, and for ground-water quality monitoring before, during, and after drilling operations;

Provisions providing for the mandatory disclosure of the chemicals in the fluids used in hydraulic fracturing projects to the director and to the commissioner of public health, and a fair process for the disclosure of fracturing fluids to facilitate transparency, while protecting valuable trade secrets and allowing well owners, operators, and service companies to protect their right to obtain an advantage over competitors;

Provisions for the safe disposal of all hydraulic fracturing fluids; and

Provisions for the restoration and reclamation of abandoned well sites, storage facility sites, pits, and access roads.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, § 11; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 544, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Oil and gas and deep drilling, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-13.

12-4-45. Powers of board as to establishment of drilling and operation units; applicability of state antitrust laws to private agreements approved by board.

In regard to the establishment of drilling units and operation units, the allocation of production, the integration of separately owned tracts of land, and agreements in the interest of conservation, the board, in addition to the jurisdiction, authority, or powers granted elsewhere in this part, shall have the specific powers with respect to the exploration or production of oil or gas enumerated below.

Drilling units. For the prevention of waste and to avoid the augmenting and accumulation of risk arising from the drilling of an excessive number of wells, the board shall, after due investigation and a hearing, have full power and authority to establish such drilling unit or units as may, in its discretion, seem most reasonable and practicable. The board shall have control of the allocation of production over such units and shall, after investigation and hearing, set up, establish, and allocate to each unit its just and equitable share of production, and shall make such orders, rules, and regulations as will give to each producer the opportunity to use his or her just and equitable share of the reservoir energy of any pool. The board shall have power after notice and hearing to review and approve, or disapprove, agreements made among owners or operators, or among owners and operators in the interest of conservation of oil or gas or both or for the prevention of waste. When two or more separately owned tracts of land are embraced within an established drilling unit, the owners thereof may validly agree to integrate their interests and to develop their lands as a drilling unit. Where, however, such owners have not agreed to integrate their interests, the board may, for the prevention of waste or to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, after notice and hearing, require such owners to do so and to develop their lands as a drilling unit. Should the owners of separate tracts embraced within a drilling unit fail to agree upon the integration of the tracts and the drilling of a well on the unit, and should it be established that the board is without authority to require integration as provided for above, then subject to all other applicable provisions of this part, the owner of each tract embraced within the drilling unit may drill on his or her tract, but the allowable production from said tract shall be such proportion of the allowable production for the full drilling unit as the area of such separately owned tracts bears to the full drilling unit.

Operation units.

For the prevention of waste and to assure the ultimate recovery of gas or oil, the board may hold a hearing to consider the need for the operation as a unit of an entire field, or of any pool or any portion thereof, or combination of pools, within a field, for the production of oil or gas or both and other minerals which may be associated and produced therewith by additional recovery methods.

At the conclusion of the hearing the board shall issue an order requiring unit operation if it finds that:

Unit operation of the field, or of any pool or of any portion or combinations thereof within the field, is reasonably necessary to prevent waste as defined in Code Section 12-4-42 or to increase the ultimate recovery of oil or gas by additional recovery methods; and

The estimated additional cost incident to the conduct of such operation will not exceed the value of the estimated additional recovery of oil or gas; provided, however, that the board shall be authorized to prohibit the production of gas or oil by any recovery method if it has determined that such recovery method will result in waste or reduce the ultimate recovery of gas or oil from any field or pool or portion or combination thereof.

The phrase "additional recovery methods" as used in this subsection shall include, but shall not be limited to, the maintenance or partial maintenance of reservoir pressures by any method recognized by the industry and approved by the board; recycling; flooding a pool or pools, or parts thereof, with air, gas, water, liquid hydrocarbons or any other substance, or any combination or combinations thereof; or any other secondary method of producing hydrocarbons recognized by the industry and approved by the board.

The order provided for in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be fair and reasonable under all the circumstances, shall protect the rights of interested parties, and shall include:

A description of the area embraced, termed the unit area, and a description of the affected pool or pools, or portions thereof, which lie within the unit area;

A statement of the nature of the operations contemplated;

A method of allocation among the separately owned tracts in the unit area of all the oil or gas or both produced from the unit pool within the unit area and not required in the conduct of such operation or unavoidably lost, such method of allocation to be on a formula that is fair and equitable and will protect the correlative rights of all interested parties;

A provision for adjustment among the owners of the unit area (not including royalty owners) of their respective investments in wells, tanks, pumps, machinery, materials, equipment, and other things and services of value attributable to the unit operations. The amount to be charged unit operations for any such item shall be determined by the owners of the unit area (not including royalty owners); provided, however, that if such owners of the unit area are unable to agree upon the amount of such charges, or to agree upon the correctness thereof, the board shall determine the amount after due notice and hearing thereon. The net amount charged against the owners of a separately owned tract shall be considered expense of unit operation chargeable against such tract. The adjustment provided for in this division may be treated separately and handled by agreements separate from the unitization agreement;

A provision that the costs and expenses of unit operations, including investment, past and prospective, be charged to the separately owned tracts in the same proportions that such tracts share in unit productions. The expenses chargeable to a tract shall be paid by the person or persons not entitled to share in production free of operating costs, and who, in the absence of unit operation, would be responsible for the expense of developing and operating such tracts, and such person's or persons' interest in the separately owned tract shall be primarily responsible therefor. The obligation or liability of such persons in the several, separately owned tracts for the payment of unit expense shall at all times be several and not joint or collective. The unit operator shall have a first and prior lien upon the leasehold estate exclusive of the royalty interest provided thereby and unleased oil and gas rights, exclusive of one-eighth interest therein, in and to each separately owned tract, and the interest of the owners thereof in and to the unit production and all equipment in possession of the unit, to secure the payment of the amount of the unit expense charged to and assessed against such separately owned tract;

The designation of, or a provision for the selection of, a unit operator. The conduct of all unit operations by the unit operator and the selection of a successor to the unit operator shall be governed by the terms and provisions of the unitization agreements;

A provision that when the full amount of any charge made against any interest in a separately owned tract is not paid when due by the person or persons primarily responsible therefor, then all of the oil and gas production allocated to the interest in default in such separately owned tract, upon which production the unit operator has a lien, may be appropriated by the unit operator and marketed and sold for the payment of such charge, together with interest at a fair and equitable rate as determined by the board thereon. The remaining portion of the unit production or the proceeds derived therefrom allocated to each separately owned tract shall in all events be regarded as royalty to be paid to the owners, free and clear of all unit expense and free and clear of any lien therefor. The owner of any overriding royalty, oil and gas payment, or other interest, who is not primarily responsible for the unpaid obligation, shall, to the extent of any payment or deduction from his or her share, be subrogated to all the rights of the unit operator with respect to the interest or interests primarily responsible for such payment. Any surplus received by the operator from any such sale of production shall be credited to the person or persons from whom it was deducted in the proportion of their respective interest; and

The time the unit operation shall become effective, and the manner in which, and the circumstances under which, the unit operation shall terminate.

An order requiring unit operation shall not become effective unless and until a contract incorporating the unitization agreement has been signed or in writing ratified or approved by the owners of at least 85 percent in interest as costs are shared under the terms of the order and by 85 percent in interest, as production is to be allocated, of the royalty owners in the unit area, and unless and until a contract incorporating the required arrangements for operations has been signed or in writing ratified or approved by the owners of at least 85 percent in interest as costs are shared, and unless and until the board has made a finding, either in the order or in a supplemental order, that those contracts have been signed, ratified, or approved. Both contracts may be encompassed in a single document. In the event the required percentage interests have not signed, ratified, or approved such agreements within six months from and after the date of such order, or within such extended period as the board may prescribe, the order shall be automatically revoked.

The board, by entry of new or amending orders, may from time to time add to unit operations portions of pools not theretofore included, and may add to unit operations new pools or portions thereof, and may extend the unit area as required. Any such order, in providing for allocation of production from a unitized zone of the unit area, shall first allocate to such pool or pools, or portion thereof so added, a portion of the total production of oil or gas, or both, from all pools affected within the unit area, as enlarged and not required in the conduct of unit operations or unavoidably lost. Such allocation shall be based on a formula for sharing that is considered to treat each tract and each owner fairly and equitably during the remaining course of unit operations. The production so allocated to such added pool or pools or portions thereof shall be allocated to the separately owned tracts which participate in such production on a fair and equitable basis. The remaining portion of unit production shall be allocated among the separately owned tracts within the previously established unit area in the same proportions as those specified prior to the enlargement unless such proportions are shown to be erroneous by data developed subsequent to the former determination, in which event the errors shall be corrected. Orders promulgated under this Code section shall become operative at 7:00 A.M. on the first day of the month next following the day on which the order becomes effective.

An order promulgated by the board under this subparagraph shall not become effective unless and until:

All of the terms and provisions of the unitization agreement relating to the extension or enlargement of the unit area or to the addition of pools or portions thereof to unit operations have been fulfilled and satisfied, and evidence thereof has been submitted to the board; and

The extension or addition effected by such order has been agreed to in writing by the owners of at least 85 percent in interest as costs are shared in the area or pools or portions thereof to be added to the unit operation by such order and by 85 percent in interest, as production is to be allocated, of the royalty owners in the area or pools or portions thereof to be added to the unit operations by such order, and evidence thereof has been submitted to the board.

In the event both of the requirements specified in subdivisions (I) and (II) of division (ii) of this subparagraph are not fulfilled within six months from and after the date of such order or within such extended period as the board may prescribe, the order shall be automatically revoked.

When the contribution of a separately owned tract with respect to any unit pool has been established, such contribution shall not be subsequently altered except to correct a mathematical or clerical error that caused the tract contribution to be erroneous, unless an enlargement of the unit is effected. No change or correction of the contribution of any separately owned tract shall be given retroactive effect, but appropriate adjustment shall be made for the investment charges as provided in this Code section.

The portion of unit production allocated to a separately owned tract within the unit area shall be deemed, for all purposes, to have been actually produced from such tract, and operations with respect to any unit pool within the unit area shall be deemed, for all purposes, to be the conduct of operations for the production of oil or gas, or both, from each separately owned tract in the unit area.

Owners, operators, and royalty owners who have separate holdings in the same oil or gas pool or in any area that appears from geological or other data to be underlaid by a common accumulation of oil or gas or both are authorized to make agreements among themselves for establishing and carrying out a plan for the cooperative development and operation of the pool or area, provided that such agreements must be approved by the board; provided, further, that such agreements must be for the purpose of conserving gas or oil or both, or for the prevention of waste, or to assure the ultimate recovery of gas or oil or both. Such agreements shall not be held or construed to violate any of the laws of this state relating to trusts, monopolies, or contracts and combinations in restraint of trade.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, §§ 14, 14A; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 544, § 55; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 12/SB 52.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation near the beginning of division (a)(2)(D)(i).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a period was substituted for a semicolon at the end of subparagraphs (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(C), (a)(2)(E), and (a)(2)(G).

12-4-46. Drilling permits.

Before any well covered by this part, other than wells for the production of fresh water, may be drilled, the person desiring to drill the well shall apply to the director for a drilling permit, using such forms as the director may prescribe, and shall pay a fee of $500.00 for each permit.

The director shall, within 30 days after the receipt of a properly completed application from any person desiring to drill a well covered by this part, issue a public notice for the permit application by posting such notice to the division website and by sending such notice via mail or e-mail to any persons who have requested notification of permit applications from the division. The director shall allow for a 30 day public comment period to begin running from the date the public notice is posted on the division website and as outlined in subsection (c) of this Code section. The director shall review and consider the public comments received during the public comment period.

The permit applicant shall provide the director's public notice of the proposed well directly to property owners and residents who may be impacted by the issuance of the permit within ten days of the date of the public notice by, at a minimum:

Posting the public notice along the road nearest to the proposed well;

Providing the public notice to all persons owning real property within one-half mile of the proposed wellhead and within one-half mile along the route of any directional borehole and any residence that has any drinking water wells within one-half mile of the proposed wellhead and within one-half mile along the route of any directional borehole; and

Publishing the public notice in at least one legal organ in the county where the well will be located.

After considering the permit application, the director shall either issue or deny a permit for the well. The director shall notify the public of the final permit decision by posting the decision to the division website and by sending notice of the decision via mail or e-mail to any persons who have requested notification of permit applications from the division.

In issuing or denying a permit for the drilling of a well covered by this part, the director shall consider the extent to which the proposed well complies with this part, all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this part, or any order under this part.

In issuing a permit for the drilling of any well covered by this part, the director shall specify therein such terms and conditions as he or she deems necessary to receive the permit and to lawfully operate thereunder. Permits shall include the following requirements:

Requirements for testing the integrity of well casings;

Requirements for maintenance and repair of roadways significantly impacted by drilling operations, including hydraulic fracturing activities; and

Requirements for buffers around wells and property line setbacks that are sufficient to protect affected property owners from any noise, light, water, or air pollution resulting from any drilling operations.

Any permit issued under this Code section shall become final unless any person named therein requests in writing a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board no later than 30 days after the issuance of such permit.

The director shall have the power and the authority to revoke a permit for noncompliance with any of the provisions of this part, any rules and regulations promulgated under this part, or the special conditions contained in any permit.

The issuance of a permit under this part in no way indicates a determination by the director as to property or contractual rights of the applicant to drill such a well at the designated location.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, § 23; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 9; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)

12-4-47. Bonds or undertaking by persons conducting drilling operations.

Prior to the issuance of a permit to drill any well covered by this part, the owner, operator, contractor, driller, or other person responsible for the conduct of the drilling operation shall furnish the state a bond or undertaking in the form prescribed by the board and in an amount set by the board, executed by a bonding, surety, or insurance company authorized to do business in this state in the favor of the state. Alternatively, the board in its discretion may require a similar undertaking executed only by such person to ensure a faithful performance of the requirements of this part, of any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or of any condition of a permit. Such bond or undertaking is intended to protect the state or any citizen thereof from any injury which may result from improper drilling.

Any bond required under this part shall be released two years from the date of receipt by the director of all geological information required under this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part; provided, however, that the director shall have examined and approved the abandoned well for which the bond was furnished.

No bond required under this part shall exceed $100,000.00.

(Ga. L. 1945, p. 366, § 24; Ga. L. 1975, p. 966, § 13; Ga. L. 1984, p. 398, § 5; Ga. L. 2018, p. 953, § 1/HB 205.)